Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB98.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Museum Unclaimed Loaned Property Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares the following:(1) The residents of this Commonwealth have an interest in the growth and maintenance of museum collections and in the preservation and protection of unclaimed loaned property of artistic, historic, cultural or scientific value left in the custody of museums within this Commonwealth.(2) Loans of property of artistic, historic, cultural or scientific value are made to museums to further educational purposes.(3) When lenders of property for museums fail to stay in contact, museums must routinely store and care for the loaned property long after the loan periods have expired or should reasonably be deemed expired.(4) Nevertheless, museums have limited rights to the use and treatment of unclaimed loaned property, all the while bearing substantial costs related to the storage, recordkeeping, climate control, security, periodic inspection, insurance, general overhead and conservation associated with the unclaimed loaned property.(5) It is in the public's interest to:(i) Encourage museums and the lenders of property for museums to use due diligence in monitoring the loaned property.(ii) Allocate fair responsibilities between museums 20250SB0098PN0053 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the lenders of property for museums.(iii) Resolve expeditiously the issue of title of unclaimed loaned property left in the custody of museums.Section 3. Purpose of act.The purpose of this act is to establish uniform rules to govern the disposition of museum unclaimed loaned property.Section 4. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Claimant." An individual, corporation, partnership, trust, estate or similar organization that files notice of intent to preserve an interest in loaned property in the custody of a museum as provided in section 9(b)."Lender." An individual, corporation, partnership, trust, estate or similar organization whose name appears on the records of a museum as the person legally entitled to control loaned property in the custody of the museum. The term includes a successor of an original lender."Loan." A transaction between a lender and a museum regarding property of the lender in which the museum maintains custody of the property."Loaned property." Property that is in the possession of a museum, accompanied by evidence that the lender of the property intended to retain title to the property and return to take physical possession of the property in the future."Museum." As follows:(1) A public or private nonprofit agency or institution that is:(i) located in this Commonwealth;20250SB0098PN0053 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) organized on a permanent basis for educational or aesthetic purposes; and(iii) owns or utilizes tangible objects, cares for tangible objects and exhibits tangible objects to the public on a regular basis.(2) The term includes a historical society, park, historic site, historic monument, archive or library."Museum records." Documents that are created or held by a museum in the regular course of business of the museum."Property." A tangible or digital object that is in the custody of a museum and that has intrinsic historical, artistic, scientific or cultural value."Restricted certified mail." Certified mail that carries on its face, in a conspicuous place where it will not be obliterated, the endorsement "deliver to addressee only" and for which the post office provides the mailer with a return receipt showing the date of delivery, the place of delivery and the person to whom delivered."Unclaimed loaned property." Property:(1) that is on loan to a museum; and(2) whose original lender, or any person acting legitimately on behalf of the lender, has not contacted the museum for at least 20 years from the beginning date of the loan of the property, if the loan of the property was for an indefinite or undetermined period or for at least five years after the date upon which the loan of the property for the definite period expired.Section 5. Museum obligations to lenders.(a) Recordkeeping for new loaned property.--For property loaned to a museum on or after the effective date of this 20250SB0098PN0053 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection, the museum shall do all of the following at the time of the loan:(1) Make and retain a written record containing at least all of the following:(i) The name, address and telephone number of the lender.(ii) A description of the loaned property in sufficient detail for ready identification.(iii) The beginning date of the loan.(iv) The expiration date of the loan.(2) Provide the lender with a signed receipt or loan agreement containing at least the record specified in paragraph (1).(3) Inform the lender of the existence of this act and provide the lender with a copy of this act upon request of the lender.(b) Recordkeeping for existing loaned property.--Regardless of the date of the loan of property to a museum, the museum shall do all of the following:(1) Update the records of the museum if:(i) a lender informs the museum of a change of address or change in ownership of the loaned property; or(ii) the lender and museum negotiate a change in the duration of the loan.(2) Inform the lender of the existence of this act when renewing or updating the records of an existing loan and provide the lender with a copy of this act upon request of the lender.Section 6. Lender obligations to museums.(a) Required notices.--Regardless of the date of the loan of 20250SB0098PN0053 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property in the custody of a museum, a lender shall promptly notify the museum in writing of the following:(1) A change of the address or telephone number of the lender.(2) The name, address and telephone number of the successor of the lender.(3) The name, address and telephone number of the designated agent of the owner of the loaned property.(4) A change of the address or telephone number of the designated agent of the owner of the loaned property.(5) A change in ownership of the loaned property and the name, address and telephone number of the new owner of the loaned property.(b) Documentation establishing ownership.--A successor of a lender shall document passage of rights of control to the loaned property in the custody of the museum.Section 7. Liability.(a) Prejudice.--Unless there is evidence of bad faith or gross negligence, a museum shall not be prejudiced by reason of any failure to deal with the true owner of loaned property.(b) Surrender of loaned property.--In a case of disputed ownership of loaned property, a museum shall not be held liable for its refusal to surrender loaned property in its possession except in reliance upon a court order or judgment.Section 8. Termination of loans for unclaimed loaned property.(a) Authorization.--A museum may terminate a loan for unclaimed loaned property in the museum's possession in accordance with this section.(b) Search.--A museum shall make a good faith and reasonable search for the identity and last known address of the lender 20250SB0098PN0053 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 from the museum records and other records reasonably available to the museum staff.(c) Notice.--(1) Following a search under subsection (b):(i) If the museum identifies the lender and the lender's last known address, the museum shall give actual notice to the lender that the loan is terminated in accordance with paragraph (2).(ii) If the identity or the last known address of the lender remains unknown, the museum shall give notice by publication in accordance with paragraph (3).(2) Actual notice of termination by a museum of a loan for unclaimed loaned property shall be provided by a letter to the lender, which shall be sent by restricted certified mail to the last known address of the lender and which shall include the following information:(i) The date of notice of termination.(ii) The name of the lender.(iii) A description of the loaned property in sufficient detail for ready identification.(iv) The approximate initiating date of the loan and termination date, if applicable and known.(v) The name and address of the designated museum official to be contacted regarding the loan.(vi) A statement that within 90 days of the date of the notice of termination, the lender is required to remove the loaned property from the museum or contact the designated museum official to preserve the lender's interests in the loaned property and that failure to do so will result in the loss of all rights in the loaned 20250SB0098PN0053 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 property in accordance with section 10.(3) Notice by publication of termination by a museum of a loan for unclaimed loaned property shall be provided as follows:(i) This paragraph only applies if:(A) a search under subsection (b) is unsuccessful and the museum is unable to send actual notice in accordance with paragraph (2); or(B) a signed return receipt of a notice sent by restricted certified mail under paragraph (2) is not received by the museum within 30 days after the notice was mailed.(ii) The museum shall publish the notice of termination, which includes all the information that is specified under paragraph (2) and available to the museum, in a publication of general circulation in the county of the last known address of the lender, if known, and the county in which the museum is located. The following apply:(A) The notice shall be published at least twice and at least 60 days apart.(B) If the loan of property was made to a branch of the museum, the museum shall be deemed to be located in the county in which the branch is located.Section 9. Return or disposition of unclaimed loaned property.(a) Written claim by lender.--If a museum receives a written claim of ownership for loaned property for which notice was provided under section 8(c)(2) or (3), the museum shall return the loaned property to the lender or carry out the disposition of the loaned property as the lender requests, not later than 90 20250SB0098PN0053 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days after receipt of the written claim of ownership. The following apply:(1) The lender shall advise the museum in writing as to the disposition of the loaned property or how the loaned property is to be returned to the lender.(2) Any costs incurred as a result of returning the loaned property or the disposition of the loaned property shall be the responsibility of the lender, unless the lender and the museum have mutually agreed to alternate arrangements.(b) Written claim by others.--If a museum receives a written claim of ownership for loaned property for which notice was provided under section 8(c)(2) or (3) from a person other than the lender or lender's agent on record with the museum, the museum shall determine if the ownership claim is valid not later than 90 days after receipt of the written claim of ownership. The following apply:(1) A claimant shall submit proof of ownership to the museum with the written claim of ownership.(2) If more than one person submits a written claim of ownership, the museum may delay its determination of ownership until the competing claims are resolved by agreement or legal action.(3) If the museum determines that the written claim of ownership is valid or if the competing claims are resolved by agreement or legal action, the museum shall return the loaned property to the claimant submitting the valid claim of ownership or dispose of the loaned property as the valid claimant requests.(4) Any costs incurred as a result of returning the 20250SB0098PN0053 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 loaned property or the disposition of the loaned property shall be the responsibility of the valid claimant, unless the valid claimant and the museum have mutually agreed to alternate arrangements.Section 10. Title to unclaimed loaned property.(a) Conditions.--As of the effective date of this subsection, a museum acquires title to unclaimed loaned property under any of the following circumstances:(1) For loaned property for which a museum provides actual notice to a lender in accordance with section 8(c)(2) and a signed receipt is received, if a lender of that loaned property does not contact the museum within 90 days after the date notice was received.(2) For loaned property for which notice by publication is made in accordance with section 8(c)(3), if a lender or any person claiming a legal interest in that loaned property does not contact the museum within 90 days after the date of the second publication of the notice.(b) Effect of act.--Nothing in this act shall preclude a museum from availing itself of any other means of establishing or perfecting title to property in the possession of the museum.Section 11. Contractual obligations.Notwithstanding the other provisions of this act, a lender and museum may bind themselves to different loan provisions by written contract.Section 12. Effect on other rights.(a) Escheat.--Property on loan to a museum shall not escheat to the Commonwealth under Article XIII.1 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, or any other law of this Commonwealth, but shall pass to the museum in 20250SB0098PN0053 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accordance with section 10.(b) Federal law.--This act shall not apply to property in the possession of a museum under Native American Graves Protection and Repatriation Act (Public Law 101-601, 104 Stat. 3048).(c) Stolen property.--This act shall not apply to property that is reported as stolen to a law enforcement agency, insurer or the art loss register, or a successor organization having similar purposes, no later than three years following the theft or discovery of the theft, or was created before 1945 and changed hands due to theft, seizure, confiscation, forced sale or other involuntary means in Europe during the Nazi era between 1933 and 1945.(d) Other property interests.--Property interests other than those specifically addressed in this act are not altered by this act.Section 13. Title to property acquired from museum.A museum that acquires title to unclaimed loaned property under this act passes good title to another person when transferring that property with the intent to pass title.Section 14. Expenses and conservation or protective measures.(a) Lien authorized.--As of the effective date of this subsection, a museum shall have a lien for expenses for the reasonable care of unclaimed loaned property after the expiration date of the loan.(b) Conditions required to apply conservation or protective measures.--Unless the written loan agreement for the property provides otherwise, a museum may apply conservation or protective measures to loaned property without the permission of the lender or formal notice to the lender if:20250SB0098PN0053 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Action is required to:(i) protect the loaned property or other property in the possession of the museum; or(ii) protect the health and safety of the public or museum staff because the loaned property is a hazard.(2) Any of the following applies:(i) The museum is unable to contact the lender at the address on record for the lender within five business days before the time in which the museum determines that action is necessary.(ii) The lender does not:(A) respond or agree to the conservation or protective measures recommended by the museum; and(B) terminate the loan and take possession of the loaned property on or before the fifth business day after the museum contacts the lender.(c) Amount of lien.--If a museum applies conservation or protective measures to loaned property under this act, or with the agreement of the lender, unless the written loan agreement for the loaned property provides otherwise, the museum shall acquire a lien on the loaned property in an amount equal to the costs incurred by the museum for the conservation or protective measures taken.(d) Liability.--A museum shall not be liable for injury to or loss of loaned property for which conservation or protective measures were taken under this act, if all of the following apply:(1) The museum had a reasonable belief at the time that the conservation or protective measures were taken that:(i) the measures were necessary to protect the 20250SB0098PN0053 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 loaned property or other property in the possession of the museum; or(ii) the loaned property was a hazard to the health and safety of the public or museum staff.(2) The museum exercised reasonable care in the choice and application of the conservation or protective measures.Section 15. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0098PN0053 - 13 - 12345678